Maine, session 132, LD185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (9) to read:
(9) Costs related to the construction, renovation or operation of municipal or
plantation public safety facilities, including facilities used as emergency shelters,
the need for which is related to general economic development within the
municipality or plantation, not to exceed 15% 25% of the captured assessed value
of the development district;
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (12) to read:
(12) Up to 50% of the capital costs related to the construction or renovation of a
municipality's or plantation's central administrative office facilities owned by a
municipality or plantation and used to provide municipal or plantation services, the
need for which is related to general economic development within the municipality
or plantation, not to exceed 15% 25% of the captured assessed value of the
development district;
Page 1 - 132LR0589(03)